Massachusetts, session 194th, S1627.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 6 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following section:- 
Section 220.(a) There shall be a commission on nurse staffing in hospitals located within, 
but not subject to the control of the executive office of health and human services. The 
commission shall work to develop safe staffing standards for all hospital units. 
(b) (1) The commission shall consist of 15 members, as follows: the secretary of health 
and human services or a designee, who shall serve as the chair; the attorney general or a 
designee; the executive director of the health policy commission or a designee; the house chair of 
the joint committee on public health; the senate chair of the joint committee on public health; one 
person appointed by the speaker of the house; one person appointed by the senate president; one 
person appointed by the minority leader of the house; one person appointed by the minority 

of 3 11 leader of the senate; and one representative from each of the following 8 organizations: 
American Nurses Association Massachusetts, Inc.; Massachusetts Emergency Nurse Association 
of; Massachusetts Nurses Association; Organization of Nurse Leaders; the Massachusetts 
Hospital Association;  Service Employees United International; Massachusetts Health Council;  
and Health Law Advocates. 
(2) Members of the commission shall serve for a term of 4 years, without compensation. 
Any member shall be eligible for reappointment. Vacancies shall be filled in accordance with 
paragraph (1) for the remainder of the unexpired term. Any member who is appointed by the 
governor may be removed by the governor for cause. 
(c) The commission may establish advisory committees to assist its work. 
(d) The commission shall: examine evidence based, tested and validated research on 
patient care quality outcomes relative to nurse staffing levels; examine evidence based, tested 
and validated research on optimal staffing levels for all units within a hospital; examine 
approaches undertaken by other states by statute or regulation to address the issue of patient 
safety relative to nurse staffing; examine any barriers to reasonable and efficient enforcement of 
staffing standards adopted in other jurisdictions; develop strategies for collaborative practice 
amongst registered nurses and other members of the health care team; hold public hearings and 
meetings to accept comment from the general public and to seek advice from experts; submit an 
annual report to the legislature as provided in subsection (e) on the state of hospital staffing in 
the Commonwealth. 
(e) The commission shall file an annual report, on or before March 1, with the joint 
committee on public health on its activities and any statutory or regulatory recommendations. 

of 3 33 The commission shall monitor the implementation of its recommendations and update 
recommendations to reflect current science and evidence based practice.